Wyoming, session 2026, HB0021.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-24-104(a) is amended to read:

9-24-104. Distribution of revenue.

(a) Not later than the fifteenth day of each month,
in accordance with commission rules, a sports wagering
operator shall remit ten percent (10%) of online sports
wagering revenue from the prior month to the commission,
HB0021

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0114
except as provided in subsection (b) of this section. Each
fiscal year:,

(i) The first three hundred thousand dollars
($300,000.00) of revenue generated under this section is
continuously appropriated to the department of health to be
distributed to the counties for the purpose of funding
county health programs to prevent and treat problematic
gambling behavior; and

(ii) One-half (1/2) of the remainder of monies
remitted to the commission shall be deposited by the state
treasurer into the Wyoming outdoor recreation and tourism
trust fund income account created by W.S. 36-4-203(b);

(iii) One-half (1/2) of the remainder of monies
remitted to the commission under this subsection shall be
deposited into the general fund.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0021